Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 2
STATE-FUNDED HEALTH AND MEDICAL CARE

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1994 and was repealed in 2002. This article was subsequently amended in 2006 resulting in the recreation of the article with relocated provisions. For amendments to this article prior to 2002, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

25.5-2-101. Old age pension health and medical care fund - supplemental old age pension health and medical care fund - cash system of accounting - legislative declaration - rules.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-210), ch. 187, p. 719, § 2, effective July 15, 2012.)

Any money remaining in the state old age pension fund after full payment of basic minimum awards to qualified old age pension recipients and after establishment and maintenance of the old age pension stabilization fund in the amount of five million dollars shall be transferred to a fund to be known as the old age pension health and medical care fund, which is hereby created. The state board shall establish and promulgate rules for administration of a program to provide health and medical care to persons who qualify to receive old age pensions and who are not patients in an institution for tuberculosis or behavioral or mental health disorders. The costs of such program, not to exceed ten million dollars in any fiscal year, are defrayed from the health and medical care fund, but all money available, accrued or accruing, received or receivable, in said health and medical care fund in excess of ten million dollars in any fiscal year is transferred to the general fund of the state to be used pursuant to law. Money in the old age pension health and medical care fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly.

Repealed.

The state department shall utilize the cash system of accounting, as enunciated by the governmental accounting standards board, regardless of the source of revenues involved, for all activities of the state department relating to the financial administration of any nonadministrative expenditure for the health and medical care programs described in subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1800, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) added, p. 465, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-261), ch. 201, p. 905, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(3)(b)(III) amended and (3)(b)(IV) and (3)(b)(V) added, (HB 10-1380), ch. 215, p. 932, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 2011:

(3)(b)(VI) added, (SB 11-164), ch. 33, p. 93, § 5, effective March 18; (3) amended, (SB 11-210), ch. 187, p. 718, § 1, effective July 1; (1) and (4) amended, (SB 11-210), ch. 187, p. 719, § 2, effective July 15, 2012.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1326, § 197, effective May 25.

25.5-2-102. Health and medical care program - aid to the needy disabled. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1801, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section repealed, p. 2043, § 72, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-2-119.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-2-103. Reproductive health-care program - report - rules - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Contraceptive methods and counseling services" means:

Any FDA-approved contraceptive drug, device, or product;

Services related to the administration and monitoring of FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and products, including management of side effects;

Counseling services for continued adherence to a prescribed regimen;

Device insertion and removal; and

Any other contraceptive methods and counseling services identified by the health resources and services administration in the United States department of health and human services or the Women's Preventive Services Guidelines as of December 17, 2019.

"Eligible individual" means an individual with reproductive capacity, regardless of gender, who would be eligible to enroll in the medical assistance program, as described in section 25.5-4-103 (13), but is not eligible due solely to the individual's immigration status, and who is not eligible for, or declines to enroll in, state medical assistance, as described in section 25.5-2-104.

"FDA" means the federal food and drug administration.

"Participant" means an eligible individual enrolled in the reproductive health-care program.

"Pharmacist" means a licensed pharmacist who has entered into a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement pursuant to section 12-280-602 to prescribe and dispense hormonal contraceptive patches and oral hormonal contraceptives.

"Provider" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-4-103 (19)(a).

On and after July 1, 2022, the state department shall administer a reproductive health-care program, referred to in this section as the "program", that provides contraceptive methods and counseling services to participants.

Upon the participant's initial and follow-up visits to the participant's provider, and unless the participant requests a shorter period of time, the program shall comply with the federal centers for disease control and prevention's selected practice recommendations for contraceptive use by ensuring the participant is offered at least a one-year supply of either:

The requested contraceptive drug, device, or product or one or more therapeutic equivalents of the requested drug, device, or product, if the therapeutic equivalent is available and approved by the FDA; or

An alternative contraceptive drug, device, or product, if a contraceptive drug, device, or product is deemed medically inadvisable by the participant's provider.

A participant's choice of a contraceptive drug, device, or product must not be infringed upon and must not require prior authorization, step therapy, or other utilization control techniques for medically appropriate contraceptive drugs, devices, or products approved by the FDA.

The state board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, including rules specifying the manner in which eligible individuals will be notified about the program and the manner in which eligible individuals may enroll in the program.

The state department shall provide contraceptive methods and counseling services to participants without imposing any cost-sharing requirements.

Beginning in state fiscal year 2023-24, the state department shall analyze and report the cost-effectiveness of the program to the public through the annual hearing, pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2. At a minimum, the report must include:

The total number of eligible individuals;

The total number of participants enrolled in the program, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender identity, and income level;

The cost of providing contraceptive methods and counseling services to participants;

The participants' preferred method of contraceptive methods; and

The cost savings realized due to avoided unintended pregnancies, including avoided hospital costs.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-009), ch. 430, p. 2845, § 2, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1191), ch. 9, p. 113, § 1, effective March 7; (1)(b) amended, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2838, § 9, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-009, see section 1 of chapter 430, Session Laws of Colorado 2021. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1289, see section 1 of chapter 399, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-2-104. State-funded health and medical care.

Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, there is created the state medical assistance program referred to in this section as "state medical assistance". State medical assistance includes all benefits and services at the same cost to the beneficiary as are offered pursuant to the medical assistance program defined in section 25.5-4-103 (13), such that, to the maximum extent possible, eligible individuals must not be able to tell that the person is enrolled in a different program from medical assistance pursuant to section 25.5-4-103 (13).

A child who is less than nineteen years of age is eligible to receive state medical assistance if the child would be eligible for medical assistance as defined in section 25.5-4-103 (13) but is not eligible due solely to the child's immigration status.

A child who is less than nineteen years of age is presumptively eligible for state medical assistance and will receive services specified by state law only if a parent or legal guardian of the child declares all pertinent information relating to the criteria of income and assets of the child's family.

State medical assistance must be funded by state funds only, except to the extent federal funds are made available through express written authorization through a federal waiver, state plan amendment, or otherwise, by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

The state department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to maximize any available federal financial participation in implementing this section.

To the maximum extent allowable under federal law, the state department shall, using appropriate funding, use the same infrastructure and provider network to deliver state medical assistance as it does to deliver medical assistance as defined in section 25.5-4-103 (13).

This section constitutes state authority within the meaning of 8 U.S.C. sec. 1621 (d), as that law existed on January 1, 2022.

During its 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", the state department shall report on its plans and progress in implementing state medical assistance.

Beginning January 1, 2026, and continuing every January thereafter, the state department, in its presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", shall report on the cost savings and health improvements associated with state medical assistance.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2838, § 10, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1289, see section 1 of chapter 399, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-2-105. State children's basic health plan.

Beginning no later than January 1, 2025, there is created the state children's basic health plan. The state children's basic health plan includes all benefits and services, at the same cost to the beneficiary, as are offered pursuant to the children's basic health plan in section 25.5-8-107, such that, to the maximum extent possible, eligible individuals must not be able to tell that they are enrolled in a different program from the plan described in section 25.5-8-107.

A child who is less than nineteen years of age is eligible to receive the state children's basic health plan if the child would be eligible for the children's basic health plan as described in section 25.5-8-107, but is not eligible due solely to the child's immigration status.

A child who is less than nineteen years of age is presumptively eligible for the state children's basic health plan and will receive services specified by state law only if a parent or legal guardian of the child declares all pertinent information relating to the criteria of income and assets of the child's family.

The state children's basic health plan must be funded by state funds only, except to the extent federal funds are made available through express written authorization through a federal waiver, state plan amendment, or otherwise, by the centers for medicare and medicaid services.

The state department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to maximize any available federal financial participation in implementing this section.

To the maximum extent allowable under federal law, the state department shall, using appropriate funding, use the same infrastructure and provider network to deliver the state's children's basic health plan as it does to deliver the children's basic health plan described in section 25.5-8-107.

This section constitutes state authority within the meaning of 8 U.S.C. sec. 1621 (d), as that law existed on January 1, 2022.

During its 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", the state department shall report on its plans and progress in implementing the state children's basic health plan.

Beginning January 1, 2026, and continuing every January thereafter, the state department, in its presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in its presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", shall report on the cost savings and health improvements associated with the state children's basic health plan.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2838, § 10, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1289, see section 1 of chapter 399, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.